Utah statutes.
73-18-15.5.   Authorizing or permitting driving a vessel in violation of law.

(1)  A person may not authorize or knowingly permit a vessel owned by him or that is under his control to be driven by a person in violation of this chapter or Title 41, Chapter 6a, Part 5, Driving Under the Influence and Reckless Driving.

(2)  A person who violates Subsection (1) is guilty of a class C misdemeanor.

